California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
The city council may, by four-fifths vote, deny all protests finding that the public health and safety require that the improvements be made and its decision thereon shall be final and conclusive. If any protests on matters which can not be modified as provided in Section 18690 hereof are sustained, the proceedings shall be abandoned but may be renewed at any time. No land shall be included within the district which in the judgment of the city council will not be benefited by the street lighting system as that body has finally determined to maintain and operate it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 860, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18692.

If no protests are filed or if all protests filed are heard and denied, or if any of the authorized modifications are made and the city council after hearing evidence on the question of benefits, determines that the territory within the finally established boundaries of the district will be benefited by the maintenance and operation finally determined upon, then the city council shall have jurisdiction to proceed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. The Final Resolution [18710. - 18711.]

18710.

The city council may, by final resolution, order the district formed. The final resolution shall:

(a) Describe the boundaries of the district as finally established.

(b) List the items of maintenance and operation agreed to be furnished, and their estimated cost for the first year, and order that those items be furnished from time to time as necessary.

(c) Order that the percentage of the total expenses of the maintenance and operation to be paid by the district shall be paid by special assessment taxes levied upon all the lands, exclusive of improvements, within the district.

(d) Specify the percentages of the total expenses of maintenance and operation to be paid by the district and by the city respectively.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18711.

A certified copy of the final resolution shall be filed with the assessor who makes the assessment for general city taxes. Thereafter the assessor in making up the city assessment roll shall segregate the property included within the district on the assessment roll under the district designation contained in the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Levying and Collecting the Assessment [18730. - 18734.]

18730.

Each year during the existence of the district and at least 30 days prior to the making of the general tax levy for city purposes, the city engineer shall furnish to the city council an estimate of the expenses for the next year of the items of maintenance and operation provided for in the final resolution. The first year the engineer shall not make an estimate but the estimate in the final resolution shall be used. The city council shall at the time of making the next general tax levy in the city and in the manner provided for the general tax levy, levy a special assessment tax upon all the lands, exclusive of improvements, within the district which will be sufficient to raise that percentage of the total sum required in the estimate which is to be raised from the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18731.

The special assessment tax shall be levied, computed, entered, collected and enforced at the same time, in the same manner, by the same persons and with the same penalties and priority of lien as other taxes for city purposes and when collected shall be paid into the city treasury to the credit of the fund of the district and shall be used only for the payment of the expenses of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1465.)
-------------------------------------------

18732.

The city council shall control and order the expenditure of the funds of the district for the purposes of maintenance and operation as provided in the final resolution. If at the expiration of any year there is an unexpended balance in the district fund, the balance shall, to that extent, reduce the fund to be raised from the district for the next year. Any balance remaining in the fund at the end of the term for which the district is formed shall be used to help furnish electric current for the systems maintained and operated from the funds raised in whole or in part from the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18733.

Each year at the time of making the special assessment tax levy the city council shall appropriate from the fund designated in the resolution of intention or from any other available fund a sum sufficient to pay that percentage of the total expenses of the maintenance and operation which is to be paid by the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18734.

The city council may also transfer from the general fund of the city to the fund of the district sufficient money to pay all or any part of the percentage of the yearly expenses of the maintenance and operation which is to be paid from funds raised from the district. The amount of money so transferred shall be deemed a loan to the district fund and shall be repaid to the general fund from the first money thereafter coming into the district fund from taxes levied upon lands within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Miscellaneous Provisions [18780. - 18781.]

18780.

The sole acts necessary to confer jurisdiction upon the city council to order the formation of a district under the provisions of this part and the furnishing of maintenance and operation for street lighting systems therein shall consist of the adoption of a resolution of intention and the publication of the same in accordance with the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18781.

No error, defect, irregularity, informality, neglect or omission of any officer of any city in any proceeding taken under the provisions of this part, which does not affect the jurisdiction of the governing body to order the formation of a district shall avoid or invalidate the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. THE HIGHWAY LIGHTING DISTRICT ACT [19000. - 19328.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [19000. - 19008.]

19000.

This part may be cited as the Highway Lighting District Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19001.

This part shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19002.

This part provides an alternative system for making the improvements authorized by this part, and this part does not apply to or affect any other provisions of this code. When any proceedings are commenced under this part, the provisions of this part and no others apply to the proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 165.)
-------------------------------------------

19003.

Unless the particular provision or the context otherwise requires, the definitions and general provisions contained in this chapter shall govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19004.

“Street lighting system” or “system” includes any system of illumination by means of street lights which are set upon poles or suspended in the air and use gas, electricity or any other feasible means of illumination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19005.

“Clerk” or “county clerk” means any person or officer who is or acts as clerk of the board of supervisors of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19006.

“Service,” and any of its variants, means and includes the furnishing of electric current or energy, gas, or other illuminating agent to all or part of any street lighting system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19007.

“Governing body” refers to the board of supervisors of the county acting as the ex officio governing body of the lighting district, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19008.

“Public highway” or “highway” includes any highway, county highway, state highway, public street, avenue, alley, park, parkway, driveway, or public place, in any county, or unincorporated town or village which is dedicated to the public and generally used for traffic by the public or which is privately owned, opened to public traffic, and located within the boundaries of a district created under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 529.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Proceedings for the Formation of the District [19030. - 19037.]

19030.

In accordance with the provisions of this part any unincorporated area in this State may be established as a highway lighting district for the purpose of installing and maintaining a street lighting system on public highways within the district for the better protection of the public traveling thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 146.)
-------------------------------------------

19031.

Proceedings for the formation of a highway lighting district may be instituted by filing, at a regular meeting of the board of supervisors of the county in which the proposed district to be benefited thereby is situated, a petition signed by 15 or more taxpayers thereof or by the owners of taxable property representing 60 percent or more of the total assessed valuation of all taxable property within the proposed district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1720.)
-------------------------------------------

19032.

The petition shall contain the name of the proposed district, a description of its boundaries, and a statement that the provisions of this part shall govern the proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19033.

The name of the proposed district shall be in the following form: ____ lighting district (using the name of the district), of ____ County (using the name of the county in which the district is situated), and if the district is established it shall be thereafter designated by that name.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19034.

Upon the presentation of a petition requesting that the District Investigation Law of 1933 be declared inapplicable to the proceedings, the clerk of the board of supervisors shall immediately refer the same to an appropriate county officer, who shall certify to the board the number of owners of taxable property within the boundaries of the proposed district whose names appear on said petition, together with the percentage of the total assessed valuation of all taxable property within the boundaries of the proposed district, which said signatures represent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1704.)
-------------------------------------------

19035.

If the certifying officer certifies that the petition bears the signatures of owners of taxable property within the proposed district, representing 60 percent or more of the total assessed valuation of all taxable property therein, the board of supervisors may determine and order, by a four-fifths vote, that the proceedings required by the District Investigation Law of 1933 are unnecessary and that said law shall not apply. The petition shall thereupon be filed without an accompanying bond or other undertaking. If said determination and order is made, the notice of hearing on the petition shall so state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1704.)
-------------------------------------------

19036.

The county assessment roll last equalized at the time the petition is first presented shall be conclusive evidence as to ownership of taxable property and the assessed value thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1704.)
-------------------------------------------

19037.

The affidavit of the person who circulated and obtained the signatures on the petition, stating that to the best of his knowledge and belief said signatures are genuine and are the signatures of taxpayers within the proposed district, shall be prima facie evidence of the facts recited.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 146.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Protests and Hearing [19050. - 19056.]

19050.

The board of supervisors shall fix a time, not less than 25 nor more than 30 days after the filing of the petition, for hearing the petition and the protests of interested persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19051.

The clerk shall cause notices of the filing and hearing of the petition to be posted at least seven days before the date set for the hearing in three public places in the district. The notice shall be headed “Notice of the proposed formation of ____ (insert name of the proposed lighting district) lighting district” in letters not less than one inch in height and in legible type it shall:

(a) State the fact and date of the filing of the petition.

(b) Specify the date and hour set for hearing the petition and the protests of interested parties.

(c) Specify the boundaries of the proposed district.

(d) Refer to the petition for further particulars.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19052.

The clerk shall also cause a notice, similar in content to the posted notice, to be published at least once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper selected by the board of supervisors which is of general circulation and is printed and published in the county in which the proposed district is located. The last publication shall be made at least seven days before the date set for the hearing of the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19053.

Any person interested, who objects either to the formation of the district, or to the extent of the district, or to the proposed improvement, or to the inclusion of his property in the district, may file a written protest, setting forth his objections, with the clerk at or before the time set for the hearing of the petition. The clerk shall indorse on each protest the date of its filing with him, and at the time appointed for the hearing he shall present all protests so filed with him to the board of supervisors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19054.

The board of supervisors shall hear and pass upon the petition and protests at the time appointed or at any time to which the hearing thereof is adjourned. Its decision thereon shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19055.

If any person protests against the extent of the district, or against the inclusion of property in the district, the board of supervisors shall have power to make such changes in the boundaries of the proposed district as it finds to be proper and advisable. The board of supervisors shall establish the boundaries of the district in accordance with its findings, but it shall not extend the boundaries of the district, nor shall it modify the boundaries so as to exclude from the proposed district any territory which will be benefited by the improvement. Any territory which in the judgment of the board will not be benefited by the improvement shall not be included within the proposed district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19056.

In the event that an ordinance requires the installation of a street lighting system by a subdivider, the board of supervisors may, as an alternative procedure, adopt a resolution stating that the territory described in the resolution is owned by the subdivider and comes under the terms of such ordinance, and order that such territory be formed into a district or annexed to a district. If this procedure is used, the provisions of this part relating to petition, notice, hearing, election, and the District Investigation Law of 1933 shall not be applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 348.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Authority to Proceed [19070. - 19071.]

19070.

If no protests are filed, or if all protests filed are heard and denied or if authorized modifications are made in the boundaries of the proposed district and the boundaries finally established, the board of supervisors shall have jurisdiction to proceed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19071.

If the board finds that the petition was signed by taxpayers representing 60 percent or more of the total assessed valuation of all taxable property within the territory therein proposed to be formed into a district, and within the boundaries thereof as finally established by the board, and that public interest and convenience do not require that an election be held upon the proposed formation of said district, it may proceed to establish the district by resolution. The provisions of Section 19112 shall apply to a district formed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1720.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Calling and Conducting the Election [19090. - 19094.]

19090.

Within 30 days after acquiring jurisdiction to proceed, the board of supervisors shall by resolution order that an election be held in the proposed district to determine whether or not the district shall be formed. The board may establish one or more voting precincts within the district and appoint one inspector, one judge, and two clerks residing in the district for each voting precinct to conduct the election, which shall be held on the next established election date not less than 130 days after the date of the resolution ordering it to be held.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 131.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19091.

The election shall be called by posting notice thereof in three public places in the proposed lighting district, and by publishing the notice in a daily or weekly newspaper, published and circulated in the district, if there is one, at least once a week for not less than 15 days. The notices shall specify the time, place and purposes of the election, give the boundaries of the proposed lighting district, and the hours during which the polls will be kept open. The polls shall be open the same hours as provided at general elections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 757.)
-------------------------------------------

19092.

The election shall be conducted in accordance with the general election laws of this state, where applicable. The ballots shall contain the words, “For lighting district,” and “Against lighting district,” and the voter shall mark his or her ballot in the space provided for that purpose, in accordance with the general election laws of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 132.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19093.

Every registered voter in the jurisdiction shall be entitled to vote at this election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 133.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19094.

The precinct boards shall canvass the votes in accordance with the general laws of this state. The board of supervisors may order the county elections official to conduct the official canvass within seven days subsequent to the holding of the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 134.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Establishing the District [19110. - 19112.]

19110.

If a majority of the votes cast at the election is in favor of a lighting district, the board of supervisors shall by resolution establish the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19111.

If a majority of the votes cast are against the lighting district, the board of supervisors shall by order so declare. No other proceedings shall be taken for the formation of another lighting district until the expiration of one year from the date of filing of the defeated petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19112.

The fact of the filing of the petition, and the resolution establishing the lighting district, shall be entered in the minutes of the board of supervisors and that entry shall be conclusive evidence of the existence and validity of the district and of the fact that all steps prerequisite to its existence were duly and regularly taken.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Authority of the Governing Body [19130. - 19132.]

19130.

The board of supervisors of the county in which the lighting district has been established shall be ex officio the governing body of the lighting district and shall serve without compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19131.

The district may sue and be sued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19132.

The governing body shall:

(a) Make all rules, regulations and laws necessary for the administration, operation and maintenance of the highway lighting district.

(b) Supervise and plan a system of highway illumination for the district and decide upon the kind of service most feasible for the district. Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the board of supervisors from installing and maintaining electric lights on highways in the district for the safety of persons using the roads and bridges and from paying for the same out of the road fund of the county or district road fund.

(c) Indicate the placing and installation of all lights and any and all subsequent additional lights, except that the governing body may authorize a designated officer to indicate the placing and installation of lights in accordance with standards adopted by the governing body.

(d) Receive bids, award and make contracts with lighting companies in the name of the district to its very best advantage for the installation and maintenance of the street lighting system or any portion thereof and for servicing the same, except the governing body may authorize a designated officer to make, execute, and administer such contracts in the name of the district in accordance with this chapter.

(e) Determine the number of employees necessary to properly care for and maintain the system. The governing body shall prescribe their duties and fix their compensation. All district employees shall hold their positions at the pleasure of the governing body.

(f) Designate the hours for lighting the district.

(g) Perform all other acts necessary or proper to carry out the provisions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 227.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Bids and Award of Contracts [19151. - 19151.]

19151.

In granting authority to install the system and in contractng for service the governing body shall impose such restrictions and conditions, and provide for such locations of the various wires and lights, as will work the least possible public or private inconvenience.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Installation of Additional Lights [19160. - 19162.]

19160.

Proceedings for the installation and maintenance of additional lights may be instituted by the governing body on its own initiative and shall be instituted by the governing body when:

(a) A written request therefor, signed by two members of the governing body, is filed with the governing body; or

(b) A petition therefor, signed by 20 or more taxpayers of the district, is filed with the governing body. The petition may consist of any number of separate instruments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1159.)
-------------------------------------------

19161.

Upon institution of proceedings pursuant to Section 19160, if the governing body determines that it will be just and equitable and in the public interest for the additional cost, if any, of installation and maintenance of additional lights to be paid by the district as a whole, it shall immediately estimate the cost of installing and maintaining the additional lights, and shall use such reserve funds as may have been accumulated for such purposes to the extent necessary. In the regular tax levy for the first fiscal year in which it is possible to do so, the governing body shall include a tax upon the taxable property within the district at the equalized value thereof, or an assessment on each parcel of real property within the district on the basis of the estimated benefit to the parcel, sufficient to pay the cost of installing and maintaining for one year the additional lights. If sufficient reserve funds are available or will be available from the tax or assessment levy already made, or after the tax or assessment levy has been made, the governing body shall proceed with the installation of the additional lights.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

19161.1.

Whenever the board of supervisors levies an assessment authorized by this chapter for the installation or maintenance of lights, the assessment shall be levied pursuant to Chapter 6.1 (commencing with Section 54701) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 487, Sec. 17.   Effective July 10, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

19162.

If the governing body determines that it will not be just and equitable, or in the public interest, for the cost of installation and maintenance of said additional lights to be paid by the district as a whole, it shall terminate the proceedings without prejudice to the filing of a new petition pursuant to Chapter 17 of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1159.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.5. Replacement of Obsolete Lighting System in Existing District [19165. - 19177.]

19165.

Upon the receipt of a petition signed by owners of taxable property representing 60 percent or more of the total assessed valuation of all taxable property within an existing highway lighting district, or within a temporary zone requested to be established by the petition in the manner provided in this chapter, the governing body of the district may replace an obsolete lighting system with a new modern county- or utility-owned lighting system where necessary for the proper operation of the district or of the portion thereof lying within the temporary zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 166.)
-------------------------------------------

19165.1.

As an alternative to the petition procedure, the board of supervisors, by a four-fifths vote, may determine that the public safety and convenience require replacement of an obsolete system. The resolution may propose that a temporary zone be established, which zone will be benefited by the work, for the purpose of levying a special tax in the zone to finance the cost of the work.

The resolution shall contain that matter required by Section 19166. Notice and hearing of the resolution shall be substantially as required by Sections 19168 and 19169. If the board of supervisors determines at the hearing, by a four-fifths vote, that it is just and equitable and in the public interest that the obsolete lighting be replaced and that the proposed temporary zone be formed, it shall fix and describe the boundaries of the proposed zone in a manner so as to exclude any territory which will not be benefited by inclusion in the zone; it shall declare the zone established; it shall designate the zone by a name or number; and it shall specify the duration and purposes of the zone, not to exceed 10 years from the beginning of the next ensuing fiscal year in which a special tax levy may be made in the zone.

Except as provided in this section, any zone formed under this section is subject to Chapter 9.5 (commencing with Section 19165).

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 167.)
-------------------------------------------

19166.

A petition asking for the removal of obsolete lights and their replacement with modern county- or utility-owned lights pursuant to this chapter may request the board of supervisors to establish a temporary zone consisting solely of contiguous territory within the district which will be benefited by the replacement lights, for the purpose of levying a special tax therein to finance the cost of removal of the old lights and installation and temporary maintenance of the new lights. The petition shall contain all of the following:

(a) A general description of the nature of the proposed replacement lights, together with a map showing the location thereof.

(b) An estimate of all costs or charges which will be incurred in connection with the removal of the old lights and the installation of the new lights, together with a statement as to the period of time, not to exceed three years, proposed for the payment of the costs or charges.

(c) An estimate of the average monthly cost of maintenance of the replacement lights.

(d) A description of the boundaries of the proposed temporary zone.

A proposal to form a temporary zone pursuant to this section is subject to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 58850) of Title 6 of Division 2 of the Government Code to the same extent as a proposal to form a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 168.)
-------------------------------------------

19167.

Upon the presentation of a petition pursuant to this chapter, the clerk of the board of supervisors shall immediately refer the same to an appropriate county officer, who shall certify to the board the number of owners of taxable property within the boundaries of the district or the proposed zone whose names appear on said petition, together with the percentage of the total assessed valuation of all taxable property within the boundaries of the district or zone, which said signatures represent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 869.)
-------------------------------------------

19168.

If the certifying officer certifies that the petition bears the signatures of owners of taxable property within the district or, if applicable, the proposed zone representing 60 percent or more of the total assessed value of all taxable property therein, the petition shall be filed, and the board of supervisors shall fix a time for hearing the petition and the protests of interested parties, and shall cause a notice of the filing of the petition and the time set for the hearing to be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in a newspaper designated by said board as most likely to give notice to the inhabitants of the district and, if applicable, the proposed zone. If there is no such newspaper, copies of the notice shall be posted in three conspicuous places in the territory included in the district or, if applicable, the proposed zone, for three weeks prior to the date fixed for hearing the petition. The notice shall contain the text of said petition, but the names of the signers of the petition need not be published.

If the certifying officer’s certificate shows that any petition requesting the establishment of a temporary zone does not bear the required number of signatures, the request for the formation of a temporary zone shall be denied, without prejudice to the filing of a new petition therefor.

In such event, or if the petition does not request the establishment of a temporary zone, and the certifying officer’s certificate shows that the petition does not bear the signatures of owners of taxable property representing 60 percent or more of the total assessed valuation of all taxable property within the existing highway lighting district, the petition shall be denied.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

19169.

Upon the date fixed for the hearing, or at any time to which it is continued, the board of supervisors shall, in addition to any other proceedings required by law, consider the request for formation of a temporary zone and any objections which may be filed against it or against the formation of the proposed zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 869.)
-------------------------------------------

19170.

If the board of supervisors determines with respect to a petition for the replacement of lights filed in conformity with this chapter, that(a) It is just and equitable, and in the public interest, that the obsolete lighting system be replaced as provided in this chapter and that the proposed temporary zone be formed, and(b) The petition was signed by resident taxpayers representing 60 percent or more of the total assessed valuation of all taxable property within the territory proposed to be formed into a zone,the board shall by resolution, entered in its minutes, fix and describe the boundaries of the proposed zone in such manner that any territory which will not be benefited by inclusion therein, or which is not contiguous thereto, or which is not described in the petition, shall not be included therein; shall declare the zone established, designating it by an identifying name or number; and shall specify the purposes and duration thereof, not to exceed 10 years from the beginning of the next ensuing fiscal year in which a special tax or assessment levy may be made in the zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

19171.

With respect to a petition for the replacement of lights which includes no request for the establishment of a temporary zone, if the board of supervisors determines that it will be just and equitable and in the public interest for the additional cost, if any, of removing the obsolete lighting system and its replacement with a modern county- or utility-owned lighting system to be paid by the district as a whole, the board of supervisors shall immediately estimate the cost of replacement of the obsolete system and installation and maintenance of the modern system, and shall include in the regular tax levy for the first fiscal year in which it is possible to do so, a tax upon the taxable property within the district at the equalized value thereof, or an assessment on each parcel of real property within the district on the basis of the estimated benefit to the parcel, sufficient to pay such cost of replacement, installation and maintenance. After the tax or assessment levy has been made, the governing body shall proceed with the replacement of the obsolete system and the installation and maintenance of the modern system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

19172.

The provisions of Sections 19036 and 19037 apply to proceedings under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 869.)
-------------------------------------------

19173.

A statement regarding the boundaries of a zone established pursuant to this chapter shall be filed as provided by Chapter 8, Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code, together with a statement as to the period of duration of said zone specified in the resolution establishing it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 869.)
-------------------------------------------

19174.

In order that the obsolete system may be removed and a modern system installed in its place and maintained immediately after the action of the board pursuant to Section 19170, the governing body may authorize the immediate removal of the obsolete system in the said zone and the installation of the modern system in said zone, and may contract to pay any costs or charges incurred by reason of such removal and such installation in equal periodic payments over a period of not to exceed the period of duration of said zone specified in the resolution establishing it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 869.)
-------------------------------------------

19175.

The board of supervisors may, from time to time, transfer moneys to the district, for the benefit of the zone, from any available funds of the county. Any moneys so transferred are hereby appropriated, and shall be used, for the payment of any currently payable expenses incurred by reason of the removal of the obsolete system and the installation of the modern system proposed for the zone, and for the cost of maintenance thereof prior to December 1st of the first fiscal year in which a special tax or assessment may be levied in and on behalf of the zone. All costs of maintenance of the modern system, subsequent to that date, shall be budgeted and included in the general levy of taxes or assessments, as the case may be, in and on behalf of the district as a whole.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

19176.

The board of supervisors shall, in the first fiscal year in which a special tax or assessment, as the case may be, may be levied in and on behalf of the zone, levy a special tax or assessment upon the taxable property therein for the purposes of the zone, and shall include in the levy a sum sufficient to repay to the county the amounts transferred to the district pursuant to Section 19175. The amounts so transferred shall be retransferred to the county treasury from the first available receipts from the special levy in the zone.

Thereafter, in the succeeding fiscal year or years during which the temporary zone remains in existence, the board of supervisors shall levy a special tax or assessment therein sufficient to pay any additional costs or charges incurred by reason of the removal of the obsolete system and the installation of the modern system therein, which may by contract be made payable in such year or years.

All special taxes or assessments levied in and on behalf of a zone, pursuant to this section, are in addition to any taxes or assessments levied therein for and on behalf of the district as a whole.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

19176.1.

Whenever the board of supervisors levies an assessment authorized by Section 19176, the assessment shall be levied pursuant to Chapter 6.1 (commencing with Section 54701) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 487, Sec. 19.   Effective July 10, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

19177.

A zone shall remain in existence for the period of time specified in the resolution of the board of supervisors which established it, and shall thereafter automatically terminate; provided, there are then no outstanding obligations payable from special taxes or assessments to be levied in the zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------


